Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 1. Judicial Council.

§ 17.1-700.
Composition of Council; committees.

The Judicial Council shall be established in the judiciary branch of state government and composed of 14 members consisting of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, one judge of the Court of Appeals, six circuit court judges, one general district court judge, one juvenile and domestic relations district court judge, two attorneys qualified to practice in the Supreme Court, and the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Chairman of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary or their designees who shall be members of the Courts of Justice committees. The Council may appoint committees to aid it in the performance of its duties, and members of such committees need not be members of the Council.

History.

1930, p. 788, § 17-222; Michie Code 1942, § 6571f; 1968, c. 387; 1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1984, c. 703; 1987, c. 141; 1998, c. 872; 2004, c. 1000; 2008, c. 115.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 1000, cl. 5 provides: “That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments or appointments to fill vacancies made after the effective date of this act shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Chairman of the
Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “the Chairmen of the Committees for Courts of Justice of the Senate and the House of Delegates.” March 10, 2021.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 substituted “established in the judiciary branch of state government and composed of 14 members” for “composed of fourteen members.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 115 inserted “or their designees who shall be members of the Courts of Justice committees” at the end of the first sentence.

Law Review.

For article discussing the Judicial Council, see 10 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 9 (1953).

For note discussing the Virginia Judicial Council’s intermediate appellate court proposal, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 209 (1982).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1. Courts. § 1.01. The Court System. Friend.

§ 17.1-701.
Appointment and terms of members.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and the legislative members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. The other members of the Council shall be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, to serve for four years, or at his pleasure. No member appointed by the Chief Justice shall be eligible to serve more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment.

History.

1930, p. 789, § 17-223; Michie Code 1942, § 6571f; 1980, c. 177; 1998, c. 872; 2004, c. 1000.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 1000, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments or appointments to fill vacancies made after the effective date of this act shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 inserted “other” preceding “members of the Council” and substituted “at” for “during” in the second sentence and added the first, fourth, fifth and sixth sentences.

§ 17.1-702.
Meetings of Council and committees.

The Chief Justice, or, in case of his inability to do so, one of the other justices of the Supreme Court, shall summon the Council to meet at Richmond during the month of October in each year, and at such other times and places as the Chief Justice, or such other justice, may designate. If any member, when so summoned, shall for any cause be unable to attend, he shall promptly notify the justice who issued the summons, of such fact, and such justice shall thereupon summon some other person possessing similar qualifications to attend and act in his stead.

Each member or other person, when so summoned, shall attend and remain throughout the proceedings of the Council, unless excused by the presiding officer, and shall advise as to any matters in respect to which, in his opinion, the administration of justice in the courts of this Commonwealth may be improved.

The Chief Justice or, in case of his inability to do so, one of the other justices of the Supreme Court, may summon the chairman or members of any committee to meet at such time and place as the Chief Justice, or such other justice, may designate.

History.

1930, p. 789, § 17-224; Michie Code 1942, § 6571g; 1966, c. 23; 1968, c. 387; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-703.
Presiding officer; study of procedure.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, or the other justice summoning the Council, shall be its presiding officer.

The Council shall, during each of its meetings, make a continuous study of the organization and the rules and methods of procedure and practice of the judicial system of the Commonwealth, the work accomplished and the results produced by the system and its various parts; and shall make studies of the need, or lack of need, of additional judges or justices of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the Court of Appeals of Virginia, and the circuit courts.

On the request of the presiding officer, the Attorney General shall attend the Council and confer with the members thereof, more particularly on the Commonwealth’s business in the courts, and for the purpose of devising methods for the prevention of undue delay in the trial of such cases.

History.

1930, p. 789, § 17-225; Michie Code 1942, § 6571h; 1968, c. 387; 1991, c. 406; 1995, c. 41; 1998, c. 872.

Law Review.

For note discussing the Virginia Judicial Council’s intermediate appellate court proposal, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 209 (1982).

§ 17.1-704.
Expenses; Secretary and assistants; printing.

Each member of the Council shall serve without compensation, and each member of the Council and of its committees summoned and attending its meetings shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses in the performance of his duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of expenses of the members shall be paid by the Virginia Supreme Court. As provided by §

17.1-315

the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court shall be the Secretary of the Judicial Council. The Council may engage such consultants or other assistants as it deems necessary for the performance of its duties.

History.

1930, p. 789, § 17-226; Michie Code 1942, § 6571i; 1964, c. 9; 1968, c. 387; 1973, c. 544; 1998, c. 872; 2004, c. 1000.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 substituted “shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses in the performance of his duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

” for “shall be allowed his actual expenses of travel and also his necessary expenses for subsistence while attending the Council” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

§ 17.1-705.
Report and recommendations.

A report of the proceedings of the Council shall be made to the General Assembly and to the Supreme Court, with such recommendations as may be agreed upon. However, this authority to make recommendations shall in no event be construed to establish rules for the judicial system of the Commonwealth.

History.

1930, p. 789, § 17-227; Michie Code 1942, § 6571i; 1991, c. 406; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-705.1.
Civil immunity for investigation of commissioners of accounts, etc.

All members of the Standing Committee on Commissioners of Accounts of the Judicial Council of Virginia shall be immune from civil liability for, or resulting from, any act, decision, omission, communication, finding, opinion or conclusion done or made in connection with the investigation of complaints against any commissioner of accounts, assistant commissioner of accounts or deputy commissioner of accounts, if such act, decision, omission, communication, finding, opinion or conclusion is done in good faith and without malicious intent.

History.

2004, c. 976.

§ 17.1-705.2.
Days when circuit courts shall be open.

Subject to §§

2.2-3300

and

17.1-207

, the Judicial Council may determine when the circuit courts of the Commonwealth shall be open for business. Any closing of the circuit courts pursuant to this section shall have the same effect as provided in subsection B of §

1-210

.

History.

2016, c. 237, 548.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 237 and 548, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not be construed to empower the Judicial Council to set the hours of operation of a circuit court clerk’s office.”